Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-3241
Districts; additional powers.

Each district shall have the power and authority to provide technical and other assistance as may be necessary or desirable in rural areas to abate the lowering of water quality in the state caused by sedimentation, effluent from feedlots, and runoff from cropland areas containing agricultural chemicals. Such assistance shall be coordinated with the programs and the stream quality standards as established by the department.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 41, p. 126;

Laws 1972, LB 1045, § 2;

Laws 1972, LB 543, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 27.